Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 4.02. Chesapeake Bay Watershed Nutrient Credit Exchange Program.

§ 62.1-44.19:12.
Legislative findings and purposes.

The 2000 Chesapeake Bay Agreement and related multistate cooperative and regulatory initiatives (i) establish allocations for nitrogen and phosphorus delivered to the Chesapeake Bay and its tidal tributaries to meet applicable water quality standards and (ii) place caps on the loads of these nutrients that may be discharged into the Chesapeake Bay watershed. These initiatives will require public and private point source dischargers of nitrogen and phosphorus to achieve significant additional reductions of these nutrients to meet the cap load allocations. The General Assembly finds and determines that adoption and utilization of a watershed general permit and market-based point source nutrient credit trading program will assist in (a) meeting these cap load allocations cost-effectively and as soon as possible in keeping with the 2010 timeline and objectives of the Chesapeake 2000 Agreement, (b) accommodating continued growth and economic development in the Chesapeake Bay watershed, and (c) providing a foundation for establishing market-based incentives to help achieve the Chesapeake Bay Program’s nonpoint source reduction goals.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 708 and 710, cl. 2 provides: “That any rights, claims, or defenses arising out of the general permit authorized under this act or arising out of Article 3.04 [4.02] (§

62.1-44.19:12

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1 of this act shall not be applicable to, raised nor asserted in any judicial proceeding, or appeals therefrom, that relate to Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits issued by the Board on June 17, 2004.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).

§ 62.1-44.19:13.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Annual mass load of total nitrogen”
(expressed in pounds per year) means the daily total nitrogen concentration (expressed as mg/L to the nearest 0.01 mg/L) multiplied by the flow volume of effluent discharged during the 24-hour period (expressed as MGD to the nearest 0.01 MGD), multiplied by 8.34 and rounded to the nearest whole number to convert to pounds per day (lbs/day) units, then totaled for the calendar month to convert to pounds per month (lbs/mo) units, and then totaled for the calendar year to convert to pounds per year (lbs/yr) units.

“Annual mass load of total phosphorus”
(expressed in pounds per year) means the daily total phosphorus concentration (expressed as mg/L to the nearest 0.01mg/L) multiplied by the flow volume of effluent discharged during the 24-hour period (expressed as MGD to the nearest 0.01 MGD) multiplied by 8.34 and rounded to the nearest whole number to convert to pounds per day (lbs/day) units, then totaled for the calendar month to convert to pounds per month (lbs/mo) units, and then totaled for the calendar year to convert to pounds per year (lbs/yr) units.

“Association”
means the Virginia Nutrient Credit Exchange Association authorized by this article.

“Attenuation”
means the rate at which nutrients are reduced through natural processes during transport in water.

“Best management practice,” “practice,”
or

“BMP”

means a structural practice, nonstructural practice, or other management practice used to prevent or reduce nutrient loads associated with stormwater from reaching surface waters or the adverse effects thereof.

“Biological nutrient removal technology”
means (i) technology that will achieve an annual average total nitrogen effluent concentration of eight milligrams per liter and an annual average total phosphorus effluent concentration of one milligram per liter, or (ii) equivalent reductions in loads of total nitrogen and total phosphorus through the recycle or reuse of wastewater as determined by the Department.

“Delivered total nitrogen load”
means the discharged mass load of total nitrogen from a point source that is adjusted by the delivery factor for that point source.

“Delivered total phosphorus load”
means the discharged mass load of total phosphorus from a point source that is adjusted by the delivery factor for that point source.

“Delivery factor”
means an estimate of the number of pounds of total nitrogen or total phosphorus delivered to tidal waters for every pound discharged from a permitted facility, as determined by the specific geographic location of the permitted facility, to account for attenuation that occurs during riverine transport between the permitted facility and tidal waters. Delivery factors shall be calculated using the Chesapeake Bay Program watershed model.

“Department”
means the Department of Environmental Quality.

“Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program”
or

“ENRC Program”

means the Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program established pursuant to subsection G of §

62.1-44.19:14

.

“Equivalent load”
means 2,300 pounds per year of total nitrogen and 300 pounds per year of total phosphorus at a flow volume of 40,000 gallons per day; 5,700 pounds per year of total nitrogen and 760 pounds per year of total phosphorus at a flow volume of 100,000 gallons per day; and 28,500 pounds per year of total nitrogen and 3,800 pounds per year of total phosphorus at a flow volume of 500,000 gallons per day.

“Facility”
means a point source discharging or proposing to discharge total nitrogen or total phosphorus to the Chesapeake Bay or its tributaries. This term does not include confined animal feeding operations, discharges of stormwater, return flows from irrigated agriculture, or vessels.

“General permit”
means the general permit authorized by this article.

“MS4”
means a municipal separate storm sewer system.

“Nutrient credit”
or

“credit”

means a nutrient reduction that is certified pursuant to this article and expressed in pounds of phosphorus or nitrogen either (i) delivered to tidal waters when the credit is generated within the Chesapeake Bay Watershed or (ii) as otherwise specified when generated in the Southern Rivers watersheds. “Nutrient credit” does not include point source nitrogen credits or point source phosphorus credits as defined in this section.

“Nutrient credit-generating entity”
means an entity that generates nonpoint source nutrient credits.

“Permitted facility”
means a facility authorized by the general permit to discharge total nitrogen or total phosphorus. For the sole purpose of generating point source nitrogen credits or point source phosphorus credits, “permitted facility” shall also mean the Blue Plains wastewater treatment facility operated by the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority.

“Permittee”
means a person authorized by the general permit to discharge total nitrogen or total phosphorus.

“Point source nitrogen credit”
means the difference between (i) the waste load allocation for a permitted facility specified as an annual mass load of total nitrogen, and (ii) the monitored annual mass load of total nitrogen discharged by that facility, where clause (ii) is less than clause (i), and where the difference is adjusted by the applicable delivery factor and expressed as pounds per year of delivered total nitrogen load.

“Point source phosphorus credit”
means the difference between (i) the waste load allocation for a permitted facility specified as an annual mass load of total phosphorus, and (ii) the monitored annual mass load of total phosphorus discharged by that facility, where clause (ii) is less than clause (i), and where the difference is adjusted by the applicable delivery factor and expressed as pounds per year of delivered total phosphorus load.

“State-of-the-art nutrient removal technology”
means (i) technology that will achieve an annual average total nitrogen effluent concentration of three milligrams per liter and an annual average total phosphorus effluent concentration of 0.3 milligrams per liter, or (ii) equivalent load reductions in total nitrogen and total phosphorus through recycle or reuse of wastewater as determined by the Department.

“Tributaries”
means those river basins listed in the Chesapeake Bay TMDL and includes the Potomac, Rappahannock, York, and James River Basins, and the Eastern Shore, which encompasses the creeks and rivers of the Eastern Shore of Virginia that are west of Route 13 and drain into the Chesapeake Bay.

“Waste load allocation”
means (i) the water quality-based annual mass load of total nitrogen or annual mass load of total phosphorus allocated to individual facilities pursuant to the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation (9VAC25-720) or its successor, or permitted capacity in the case of nonsignificant dischargers; (ii) the water quality-based annual mass load of total nitrogen or annual mass load of total phosphorus acquired pursuant to §

62.1-44.19:15

for new or expanded facilities; or (iii) applicable total nitrogen or total phosphorus waste load allocations under the Chesapeake Bay total maximum daily loads (TMDLs) to restore or protect the water quality and beneficial uses of the Chesapeake Bay or its tidal tributaries.

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710; 2012, cc. 748, 808; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2015, c. 164; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363, 364.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 6 provides: “That upon the Governor’s approval of the provisions of this act, the Department of Environmental Quality shall seek the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency’s rescission of authorization for delegation of program authority to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to return delegation of program authority to the State Water Control Board for the issuance of the national pollutant discharge elimination system permits for the control of stormwater discharges for MS4 and construction activities under the federal Clean Water Act. Permits issued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board or a Virginia Erosion and Sediment Control Program authority or a Virginia Stormwater Management Program authority acting under the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board’s authority that have not expired or been revoked or terminated before or on the program transfer date shall continue to remain in full force and effect until their specified expiration dates.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 4 provides: “That if the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources (the Secretary) determines on or after July 1, 2026, that the Commonwealth has not achieved, or in the event of increased nutrient loads associated with climate change will not be able to maintain, its nitrogen pollution reduction commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan, the Secretary may develop an additional watershed implementation plan or plans pursuant to §

2.2-218

of the Code of Virginia. Any such plan shall take into consideration the progress made by all point and nonpoint sources toward meeting applicable load and waste load allocations, the best available science and water quality modeling, and any applicable U.S. Environmental Protection Agency guidance for Chesapeake Bay TMDL implementation. In any such plan, the Secretary may include as priority projects upgrades with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L annual average total nitrogen concentration at municipal wastewater treatment facilities with a design capacity greater than 10.0 MGD discharging to James River Segment JMSTF2 so long as (i) the scheduled date for compliance is January 1, 2036; (ii) notwithstanding the wasteload allocations specified in clause (iii), compliance requires operating the nutrient removal technology to achieve an annual average total nitrogen concentration of less than or equal to 4.0 mg/L or, until such time as the facility is upgraded to achieve such concentration, the option of achieving an equivalent discharged load based on an annual average total nitrogen concentration of 4.0 mg/L and actual annual flow treated, including the use of point source nitrogen credits; and (iii) the facilities have and retain the following total nitrogen waste load allocations: Falling Creek WWTP (182,738 lbs/year), Proctors Creek WWTP (411,151 lbs/year and, in the event that Proctors Creek WWTP is expanded in accordance with 9VAC25-40-70 and Falling Creek WWTP is upgraded to achieve 4.0 mg/L, 493,391 lbs/year), and Henrico County WWTP (1,142,085 lbs/year). If the Secretary opts to include such facilities in the plan, the State Water Control Board shall include the foregoing concentrations limits, waste load allocations, and schedules for compliance in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation, the Watershed General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, and individual VPDES permits, as applicable.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 748 and 808 are identical, and in the definition of “waste load allocation,” inserted “or permitted capacity in the case of nonsignificant dischargers” in clause (i), inserted “waste load allocations under the Chesapeake Bay” and “(TMDLs)” in clause (iii), and made a stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and added the paragraphs defining “Best management practice,” “practice,” or “BMP,” “MS4,” “Nutrient credit” or “credit,” and “Nutrient credit-generating entity.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 164 substituted “listed in the Chesapeake Bay TMDL” for “for which separate tributary strategies were prepared pursuant to §

2.2-218

” and “Shore” for “Coastal Basin” in the definition of “Tributaries.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted the definition for “Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program” or “ENRC Program.”

§ 62.1-44.19:14.
Watershed general permit for nutrients.

The Board shall issue a Watershed General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Permit, hereafter referred to as the general permit, authorizing point source discharges of total nitrogen and total phosphorus to the waters of the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries. Except as otherwise provided in this article, the general permit shall control in lieu of technology-based, water quality-based, and best professional judgment, interim or final effluent limitations for total nitrogen and total phosphorus in individual Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits for facilities covered by the general permit where the effluent limitations for total nitrogen and total phosphorus in the individual permits are based upon standards, criteria, waste load allocations, policy, or guidance established to restore or protect the water quality and beneficial uses of the Chesapeake Bay or its tidal tributaries.

This section shall not be construed to limit or otherwise affect the Board’s authority to establish and enforce more stringent water quality-based effluent limitations for total nitrogen or total phosphorus in individual permits where those limitations are necessary to protect local water quality. The exchange or acquisition of credits pursuant to this article shall not affect any requirement to comply with such local water quality-based limitations.

The general permit shall contain the following:

Waste load allocations for total nitrogen and total phosphorus for each permitted facility expressed as annual mass loads, including reduced waste load allocations where applicable under the ENRC Program. The allocations for each permitted facility shall reflect the applicable individual water quality-based total nitrogen and total phosphorus waste load allocations. An owner or operator of two or more facilities located in the same tributary may apply for and receive an aggregated waste load allocation for total nitrogen and an aggregated waste load allocation for total phosphorus for multiple facilities reflecting the total of the water quality-based total nitrogen and total phosphorus waste load allocations established for such facilities individually;

A schedule requiring compliance with the combined waste load allocations for each tributary as soon as possible taking into account (i) opportunities to minimize costs to the public or facility owners by phasing in the implementation of multiple projects; (ii) the availability of required services and skilled labor; (iii) the availability of funding from the Virginia Water Quality Improvement Fund as established in § 10.1-2128, the Virginia Water Facilities Revolving Fund as established in §

62.1-225

, and other financing mechanisms; (iv) water quality conditions; and (v) other relevant factors. Following receipt of the compliance plans required by subdivision C 3, the Board shall reevaluate the schedule taking into account the information in the compliance plans and the factors in this subdivision, and may modify the schedule as appropriate;

A requirement that the permittees shall either individually or through the Association submit compliance plans to the Department for approval. The compliance plans shall contain, at a minimum, any capital projects and implementation schedules needed to achieve total nitrogen and phosphorus reductions sufficient to comply with the individual and combined waste load allocations of all the permittees in the tributary. The compliance plans may rely on the exchange of point source credits in accordance with this article, but not the acquisition of credits through payments authorized by §

62.1-44.19:18

, to achieve compliance with the individual and combined waste load allocations in each tributary. The compliance plans shall be updated annually and submitted to the Department no later than February 1 of each year. The compliance plans due beginning February 1, 2023, shall address the requirements of the ENRC Program;

Such monitoring and reporting requirements as the Board deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this article;

A procedure that requires every owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit to discharge 100,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, directly into tidal waters, or 500,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, directly into nontidal waters, to secure general permit coverage by filing a registration statement with the Department within a specified period after each effective date of the general permit. The procedure shall also require any owner or operator of a facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit to discharge 40,000 gallons or more per day, or an equivalent load, directly into tidal or nontidal waters to secure general permit coverage by filing a registration statement with the Department at the time he makes application with the Department for a new discharge or expansion that is subject to an offset or technology-based requirement in §

62.1-44.19:15

, and thereafter within a specified period of time after each effective date of the general permit. The procedure shall also require any owner or operator of a facility with a discharge that is subject to an offset requirement in subdivision A 5 of §

62.1-44.19:15

to secure general permit coverage by filing a registration statement with the Department prior to commencing the discharge and thereafter within a specified period of time after each effective date of the general permit. The general permit shall provide that any facility authorized by a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit and not required by this subdivision to file a registration statement shall be deemed to be covered under the general permit at the time it is issued, and shall file a registration statement with the Department when required by this section. Owners or operators of facilities that are deemed to be permitted under this section shall have no other obligation under the general permit prior to filing a registration statement and securing coverage under the general permit based upon such registration statement;

A procedure for efficiently modifying the lists of facilities covered by the general permit where the modification does not change or otherwise alter any waste load allocation or delivery factor adopted pursuant to the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation (9VAC25-720) or its successor, or an applicable total maximum daily load. The procedure shall also provide for modifying or incorporating new waste load allocations or delivery factors, including the opportunity for public notice and comment on such modifications or incorporations; and

Such other conditions as the Board deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and § 402 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1342).

The Board shall (i) review during the year 2020 and every 10 years thereafter the basis for allocations granted in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation (9VAC25-720) and (ii) as a result of such decennial reviews propose for inclusion in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation (9VAC25-720) either the reallocation of unneeded allocations to other facilities registered under the general permit or the reservation of such allocations for future use.
D. 1. The Board shall (i) review during the year 2020 and every 10 years thereafter the basis for allocations granted in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation (9VAC25-720) and (ii) as a result of such decennial reviews propose for inclusion in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation (9VAC25-720) either the reallocation of unneeded allocations to other facilities registered under the general permit or the reservation of such allocations for future use.

For each decennial review, the Board shall determine whether a permitted facility has:

Changed the use of the facility in such a way as to make discharges unnecessary, ceased the discharge of nutrients, and become unlikely to resume such discharges in the foreseeable future; or

Changed the production processes employed in the facility in such a way as to render impossible, or significantly to diminish the likelihood of, the resumption of previous nutrient discharges.

Significant establishment of conservation easements or other perpetual instruments that are associated with a deed and that restrict growth or development;

Constructed treatment facility capacity;

Significant changes in the understanding of the water chemistry or biology of receiving waters that would reasonably result in unused nutrient discharge allocations over an extended period of time;

Significant changes in treatment technologies that would reasonably result in unused nutrient discharge allocations over an extended period of time;

The ability of the permitted facility to accommodate projected growth under existing nutrient waste load allocations; and

Other similarly significant factors that the Board determines reasonably to affect the allocations granted.

The Board shall not reduce allocations based solely on voluntary improvements in nutrient removal technology.

The Board shall maintain and make available to the public a current listing, by tributary, of all permittees and permitted facilities under the general permit, together with each permitted facility’s total nitrogen and total phosphorus waste load allocations, and total nitrogen and total phosphorus delivery factors.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, in the event that there are conflicting or duplicative conditions contained in the general permit and an individual Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, the conditions in the general permit shall control.

The Board shall adopt amendments to the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation and modifications to Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits or registration lists to establish and implement the Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program (ENRC Program) as provided in this subsection. The ENRC Program shall consist of the following projects and the following waste load allocation reductions and their respective schedules for compliance.

Priority projects for additional nitrogen and phosphorus removal (schedule for compliance):

Click to view

Each priority project and the associated schedule of compliance shall be incorporated into the applicable Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or registration list. Each priority project facility shall be in compliance by complying with applicable annual average total nitrogen and total phosphorus concentrations for compliance years 2026, 2028, and 2032 or, only for a facility subject to an aggregated waste load allocation, by exercising the option of achieving an equivalent discharged load by the date set out in the schedule of compliance based on the applicable total nitrogen and total phosphorus annual average concentrations and actual annual flow treated without the acquisition and use of point source credits generated by permitted facilities not under common ownership. Noncompliance shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other condition of a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit.

Nitrogen waste load allocation reductions — HRSD-York River WWTP:

Reduce the total nitrogen waste load allocation for the HRSD-York River WWTP to 228,444 lbs/year effective January 1, 2026.

James River HRSD SWIFT nutrient upgrades:

Reduce total nitrogen waste load allocations for HRSD treatment works in the James River basin to the following allocations effective January 1, 2026:

Click to view

Reduce total phosphorus waste load allocations for HRSD treatment works in the James River basin to the following allocations effective January 1, 2026:

Click to view

Reduce total phosphorus waste load allocations for HRSD treatment works in the James River basin to the following allocations effective January 1, 2030:

Click to view

Reduce total phosphorus waste load allocations for HRSD treatment works in the James River basin to the following allocations effective January 1, 2032:

Click to view

Transfer the total nitrogen (454,596 lbs/year) and total phosphorus (41,450 lbs/year) waste load allocations for the HRSD-Chesapeake/Elizabeth STP to the Nutrient Offset Fund effective January 1, 2026.

Transfer the total nitrogen (153,500 lbs/yr) and total phosphorous (17,437 lbs/yr) waste load allocations for the HRSD-J.H. Miles Facility consolidation to HRSD in accordance with the approved registration list December 21, 2015, transfer.

3.

Beginning in 2030, each review also shall consider the following factors for municipal wastewater facilities:

a.

Substantial changes in the size or population of a service area;

b.

Significant changes in land use resulting from adopted changes to zoning ordinances or comprehensive plans within a service area;

PROJECT NAME DESCRIPTION (COMPLIANCE SCHEDULE) HRSD-Chesapeake/Elizabeth STP Consolidate into regional system and close treatment facility (1/1/2023) HRSD-Boat Harbor WWTP Convey by subaqueous crossing to Nansemond River WWTP for nutrient removal (1/1/2026) HRSD-Nansemond River WWTP Upgrade and expand with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen (1/1/2026) and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2032) HRSD-Nassawadox WWTP Convey to regional system for nutrient removal (1/1/2026) Fredericksburg WWTF Expand with nutrient removal technology of 3.0 mg/L total nitrogen and 0.22 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2026) Spotsylvania Co.-FMC WWTF Convey to Massaponax WWTF and close treatment facility (1/1/2026) Spotsylvania Co.-Massaponax WWTF Expand with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus to consolidate and close FMC WWTF (1/1/2026) Spotsylvania Co.-Thornburg STP Upgrade with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2026) HRRSA-North River WWTP Phosphorus removal tertiary filtration upgrade (1/1/2026) South Central Wastewater Authority WWTF Upgrade with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2026) HRSD-Williamsburg WWTP Upgrade with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen (1/1/2026) and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2032) HRSD-VIP WWTP Upgrade with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen (1/1/2026) and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2032) HRSD-James River WWTP Upgrade with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen (1/1/2026) and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2028) HRSD-Army Base WWTP Convey to VIP WWTP for nutrient removal (1/1/2032) or upgrade with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L total nitrogen (1/1/2026) and 0.30 mg/L total phosphorus (1/1/2032)

FACILITY NAME TOTAL NITROGEN WASTELOAD ALLOCATION (lbs/year) HRSD-Army Base WWTP 219,307 HRSD-Boat Harbor STP 304,593 HRSD-James River STP 243,674 HRSD-VIP WWTP 487,348 HRSD-Nansemond STP 365,511 HRSD-Williamsburg STP 274,133

FACILITY NAME TOTAL PHOSPHORUS WASTELOAD ALLOCATION (lbs/year) HRSD-Army Base WWTP 27,413 HRSD-Boat Harbor STP 38,074 HRSD-James River STP 30,459 HRSD-VIP WWTP 60,919 HRSD-Nansemond STP 45,689 HRSD-Williamsburg STP 34,267

FACILITY NAME TOTAL PHOSPHORUS WASTELOAD ALLOCATION (lbs/year) HRSD-Army Base WWTP 21,931 HRSD-Boat Harbor STP 30,459 HRSD-James River STP 24,367 HRSD-VIP WWTP 48,735 HRSD-Nansemond STP 36,551 HRSD-Williamsburg STP 27,413

FACILITY NAME TOTAL PHOSPHORUS WASTELOAD ALLOCATION (lbs/year) HRSD-Army Base WWTP 16,448 HRSD-Boat Harbor STP 22,844 HRSD-James River STP 18,276 HRSD-VIP WWTP 36,551 HRSD-Nansemond STP 27,413 HRSD-Williamsburg STP 20,560

History.

2005, cc. 708, 710; 2010, c. 288; 2017, c. 9; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363, 364; 2022, cc. 127, 128.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 361 and 704, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The State Water Control Board shall accept petitions through July 10, 2009, for purposes of the expedited process set forth in this section, from the facilities subject to waste load allocations for two or more design flows based on their respective certificates to operate as of December 31, 2010. The petitions shall be for the sole purpose of extending the deadline to no later than December 31, 2015, to obtain the certificate to operate at the higher design flow, subject to the condition that such facilities shall nevertheless be required to comply with such nutrient allocations as of January 1, 2011, whether by point source nutrient credit exchanges under §

62.1-44.19:14

of the Code of Virginia or otherwise. The State Water Control Board shall, with respect to these facilities, approve or deny such petitions and adopt any regulation amendments to incorporate any approved petitions within 180 days of the petition deadline. Prior to a final decision on the petitions, the State Water Control Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment.”

Acts 2009, cc. 361 and 704, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board’s adoption of any regulation amendments made pursuant to this act shall be exempt from Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia of the Administrative Process Act.”

Acts 2009, cc. 361 and 704, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall not prohibit any person from petitioning the State Water Control Board at any time to amend existing nutrient waste load allocations pursuant to §

2.2-4007

.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 2 provides: “That the Enhanced Nutrient Removal Certainty Program as established in subdivisions G 1, 2, and 3 of §

62.1-44.19:14

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be deemed to implement through January 1, 2026, the Commonwealth’s Chesapeake Bay Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan in lieu of the floating waste load allocation concept proposed in Initiative 52 of the Commonwealth’s Chesapeake Bay Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan. However, nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the State Water Control Board’s authority to impose (i) additional requirements or modifications to phosphorous waste load allocations necessary to achieve compliance with the numeric chlorophyll-a criteria applicable to the James River; (ii) requirements or modifications to waste load allocations necessary to comply with changes to federal law that become effective after January 1, 2021; or (iii) requirements or modifications to waste load allocations necessary to comply with a court order issued after January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 3 provides: “That the State Water Control Board shall modify the Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (VPDES) permits for the facilities listed in subdivision G 1 of §

62.1-44.19:14

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, to include any requirements and compliance schedules established in this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, cl. 4 provides: “That if the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources (the Secretary) determines on or after July 1, 2026, that the Commonwealth has not achieved, or in the event of increased nutrient loads associated with climate change will not be able to maintain, its nitrogen pollution reduction commitments in the Chesapeake Bay Total Maximum Daily Load (TMDL) Phase III Watershed Implementation Plan, the Secretary may develop an additional watershed implementation plan or plans pursuant to §

2.2-218

of the Code of Virginia. Any such plan shall take into consideration the progress made by all point and nonpoint sources toward meeting applicable load and waste load allocations, the best available science and water quality modeling, and any applicable U.S. Environmental Protection Agency guidance for Chesapeake Bay TMDL implementation. In any such plan, the Secretary may include as priority projects upgrades with nutrient removal technology of 4.0 mg/L annual average total nitrogen concentration at municipal wastewater treatment facilities with a design capacity greater than 10.0 MGD discharging to James River Segment JMSTF2 so long as (i) the scheduled date for compliance is January 1, 2036; (ii) notwithstanding the wasteload allocations specified in clause (iii), compliance requires operating the nutrient removal technology to achieve an annual average total nitrogen concentration of less than or equal to 4.0 mg/L or, until such time as the facility is upgraded to achieve such concentration, the option of achieving an equivalent discharged load based on an annual average total nitrogen concentration of 4.0 mg/L and actual annual flow treated, including the use of point source nitrogen credits; and (iii) the facilities have and retain the following total nitrogen waste load allocations: Falling Creek WWTP (182,738 lbs/year), Proctors Creek WWTP (411,151 lbs/year and, in the event that Proctors Creek WWTP is expanded in accordance with 9VAC25-40-70 and Falling Creek WWTP is upgraded to achieve 4.0 mg/L, 493,391 lbs/year), and Henrico County WWTP (1,142,085 lbs/year). If the Secretary opts to include such facilities in the plan, the State Water Control Board shall include the foregoing concentrations limits, waste load allocations, and schedules for compliance in the Water Quality Management Planning Regulation, the Watershed General Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit, and individual VPDES permits, as applicable.”

Acts
2022, cc. 127 and
128, cl. 2 provides: “That the nutrient technology requirements of 3.0 mg/L total nitrogen and 0.22 mg/L total phosphorus for the Fredericksburg Waste Water Treatment Facility established in the first enactment clause of this act shall take effect and apply on an annual basis when the expanded Fredericksburg Waste Water Treatment Facility receives its certificate to operate.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 288 inserted the third sentence in subdivision C 5.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 9 added subsection D and renumbered the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “(9VAC25-720)” for “(9VAC25-270)” in subdivision C 6.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 363 and 364, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “The Board” for “By January 1, 2006, or as soon thereafter as possible, the board” in subsection A; inserted “including reduced waste load allocations where applicable under the ENRC Program” in subdivision C 1; in subdivision C 3, deleted “within nine months after the initial effective date of the general permit” following “A requirement that” and added the last sentence; and added subsection G.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 127 and 128 are identical, and inserted the entries in both columns for “Fredericksburg WWTF” in subdivision G 1 in the list after the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Environmental Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 383 (2007).